Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Division 2. Sexually Transmitted Diseases

§ 35-4-130.
Declared contagious and dangerous to health; list of reportable diseases established by department of health; violation of W.S. 35-4-130 through 35-4-134; penalty.

Sexually transmitted diseases as included within the list of reportable diseases of the department of health are contagious, infectious, communicable and dangerous to public health.

The department of health shall by rule and regulation develop a list of reportable sexually transmitted diseases including all venereal diseases and acquired immune deficiency syndrome. The list shall be available to all physicians, health officers, hospitals and other health care providers and facilities within the state.

Any person violating W.S.

35-4-130

through

35-4-134

or failing or refusing to comply with any order lawfully issued under W.S.

35-4-130

through

35-4-134

is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 160, § 22; R.S. 1931, § 103-233; C.S. 1945, § 63-138; W.S. 1957, § 35-176; Laws 1973, ch. 134, § 2; 1989, ch. 218, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to authority to make rules and regulations concerning the control of venereal diseases, see §

35-1-229

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “An Ounce of Prevention Where There is No Cure: AIDS and Public Health in Wyoming,” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 471 (1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Tort liability for infliction of venereal disease, 40 ALR4th 1089.

State statutes or regulations expressly governing disclosure of fact that person has tested positive for human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) or acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS), 12 ALR5th 149.

Transmission or risk of transmission of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) or acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS) as basis for prosecution or sentencing in criminal or military discipline case, 13 ALR5th 628.

§ 35-4-131.
Consent of minors to treatment; treatment of infected or exposed persons; immunity from liability.

Persons under eighteen (18) years of age may give legal consent for examination and treatment for any sexually transmitted disease infection.

For the protection of public health, a physician, health officer or other person or facility providing health care in accordance with state or federal law shall for any individual regardless of age, sex, race or color:

If reasonably suspected of being infected with any sexually transmitted disease, administer, refer for or recommend appropriate and adequate treatment;

If exposed to any sexually transmitted disease, recommend or offer treatment.

Physical examination and treatment by a licensed physician or other qualified health care provider of a person under eighteen (18) years of age consenting to examination or treatment is not an assault or an assault and battery upon that person.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 134, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-176.1; Laws 1989, ch. 218, § 1; 1993, ch. 1, § 1.

Statute does not require that HIV victims be informed of their status. —

Because Wyoming's reporting statutes are primarily intended to protect the general public, and not Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV) victims, the laboratory did not commit negligence per se by not informing plaintiffs of their HIV status. Pehle v. Farm Bureau Life Ins. Co., 397 F.3d 897, 2005 U.S. App. LEXIS 2051 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2005).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Medical practitioner's liability for treatment given child without parent's consent, 67 ALR4th 511.

Damage action for HIV testing without consent of person tested, 77 ALR5th 541.

§ 35-4-132.
Report required of health care providers, facilities and laboratories; notification; confidentiality of information.

A physician or other health care provider diagnosing or treating a case of sexually transmitted disease, the administrator of a hospital, dispensary, charitable or penal institution or any other health care facility in which there is a case of sexually transmitted disease and the administrator or operator of a laboratory performing a positive laboratory test for sexually transmitted disease shall report the diagnosis, case or positive test results to both the department of health and the appropriate health officer in a form and manner directed by the department. Health care providers and facilities shall cooperate with and assist the department and health officers in preventing the spread of sexually transmitted disease.

The department of health shall compile the number of reported cases within the state.

Any physician or other health care provider and any administrator or operator of a health care facility or laboratory reporting a diagnosis, case or positive test result pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall notify any health care professional and health care employee reasonably expected to be at risk of exposure to a dangerous or life-threatening sexually transmitted disease and involved in the supervision, care and treatment of an individual infected or reasonably suspected of being infected with a dangerous or life-threatening sexually transmitted disease.

Information and records relating to a known or suspected case of sexually transmitted disease which has been reported, acquired and maintained under W.S.

35-4-130

through

35-4-134

are confidential and except as otherwise required by law, shall not be disclosed unless the disclosure is:

For statistical purposes, provided that the identity of the individual with the known or suspected case is protected;

Necessary for the administration and enforcement of W.S.

35-4-130

through

35-4-134

and department rules and regulations related to the control and treatment of sexually transmitted diseases;

Made with the written consent of the individual identified within the information or records; or

For notification of health care professionals and health care employees pursuant to subsection (c) of this section as necessary to protect life and health.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 160, § 23; R.S. 1931, § 103-234, C.S. 1945, § 63-139; W.S. 1957, § 35-177; Laws 1965, ch. 37, § 1; 1989, ch. 218, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1992, ch. 37, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for failure to report diseases, see §

35-1-105

.

HIV reports. —

Because Wyoming's reporting statutes are primarily intended to protect the general public, and not Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV) victims, the laboratory did not commit negligence per se by not informing plaintiffs of their HIV status. Pehle v. Farm Bureau Life Ins. Co., 397 F.3d 897, 2005 U.S. App. LEXIS 2051 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2005).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “An Ounce of Prevention Where There is No Cure: AIDS and Public Health in Wyoming,” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 471 (1992).

§ 35-4-133.
Examination and treatment of infected persons; treatment at public expense; notification of exposed individuals; suppression of prostitution.

Upon receipt of a report or notice of a case or a reasonably suspected case of sexually transmitted disease infection, a health officer within his respective jurisdiction:

May isolate the individual in accordance with existing standards of medical practice;

If examination has not been performed, may provide for the examination of the infected individual or the individual reasonably suspected of suffering from a sexually transmitted disease and shall report the examination results to the individual;

May require the infected individual to seek adequate treatment or, subject to subsection (d) of this section, may require the individual to submit to treatment at public expense; and

May arrange for education and counseling of the infected individual as to the medical significance of the sexually transmitted disease.

To the extent possible, the health officer shall identify any other person with whom the infected individual has had contact which may have resulted in significant exposure of that person to a dangerous or life-threatening sexually transmitted disease. For purposes of this subsection, “significant exposure” means:

Contact of an emergency medical services provider’s broken skin or mucous membrane with the infected individual’s blood or bodily fluids other than tears or perspiration;

That a needle stick, or scalpel or other instrument wound has occurred in the process of caring for the infected individual;

Sexual contact;

Exposure that occurs by any other method of transmission defined by the department as a significant exposure; or

Exposure that occurs during the course of examination or treatment by dental care providers.

To the extent possible, a health officer shall make every reasonable effort to notify any person identified in subsection (b) of this section of his possible exposure to a sexually transmitted disease. Such notification shall include the name of the sexually transmitted disease to which the person may have been exposed, the approximate date of possible exposure, and shall advise the person of the nature of the disease and sources for education and counseling as to the medical significance of the disease. The health officer shall not provide information as to the specific identity of the infected individual unless the health officer has received written authorization for release of information from the infected individual.

Public funds appropriated for treatment of any individual infected with a sexually transmitted disease shall be spent in accordance with priorities established by the department of health. In establishing priorities, the department shall consider the treatment’s cost, effectiveness, curative capacity and public health benefit to the state.

A health officer shall investigate sources of sexually transmitted disease, cooperate with the proper law enforcement officials in enforcing laws against prostitution and otherwise assist in the suppression of prostitution.

Upon receipt of information documenting an actual exposure of a health care worker as provided in paragraphs (b)(i) and (ii) of this section to blood or body fluids of a patient where the exposure could lead to a communicable disease infection which is capable of transmission by blood or other body fluids, a health care provider acting within his scope of practice may order appropriate testing to be performed on a specimen from the patient by a duly licensed and accredited laboratory. If the patient’s specimen is not available for testing, a health care provider acting within his scope of practice, or county health officer may, with the patient’s consent, order the necessary testing according to the rules and regulations promulgated by the Wyoming department of health. If the patient does not consent to testing, the county health officer or the authority responsible for the care of the patient may apply to the district court for an order to have the necessary testing performed. Test results will be kept confidential and will be reported by the health care provider in accordance with W.S.

35-4-130

through

35-4-134

. Reports to the department of health shall be made on an official state disease case report form or the report may be made by telephone with confirmation by the written form. For purposes of this section, “health care worker” means all personnel involved in the care of a patient, including first responders, such as law enforcement officers, rescue personnel and those acting as good samaritans.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 160, § 24; R.S. 1931, § 103-235; C.S. 1945, § 63-140; W.S. 1957, § 35-178; Laws 1989, ch. 218, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1992, ch. 37, § 1; ch. 75, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to quarantine for venereal disease, see §

35-4-104

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Police power as authorizing legislation requiring arrested person to submit to physical examination for control of venereal disease, 25 ALR2d 1407.

Transmission or risk of transmission of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) or acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS) as basis for prosecution or sentencing in criminal or military discipline case, 13 ALR5th 628.

Damage action for HIV testing without consent of person tested, 77 ALR5th 541.

Validity and propriety under circumstances, of court-ordered HIV testing, 87 ALR5th 631.

§ 35-4-134.
Examination and treatment of prisoners.

Any individual confined or imprisoned in any state penal institution, county or city jail or any community correctional facility shall be examined for sexually transmitted diseases by the appropriate health officer or his qualified designee.

To suppress the spread of sexually transmitted disease among the confined population, the health officer or his qualified designee may:

Isolate prisoners infected with a treatable illness within the facility and require them to report for treatment by a licensed physician; or

In the case of an individual infected with a noncurable sexually transmitted disease, provide for the minimum care and treatment of the individual pursuant to rules promulgated by the department of health with the advice of the department of corrections.

Nothing herein contained shall be construed to interfere with the service of any sentence imposed by a court as a punishment for the commission of a crime.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 160, § 25; R.S. 1931, § 103-236; C.S. 1945, § 63-141; W.S. 1957, § 35-179; Laws 1989, ch. 218, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and propriety under circumstances, of court-ordered HIV testing, 87 ALR5th 631.

Federal constitutional and statutory claims by HIV-positive inmates as to medical treatment or conditions of confinement, 162 ALR Fed 181.

§§ 35-4-135 through 35-4-137.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 218, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to sexually transmitted diseases, see §§

35-4-130

through

35-4-134

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1921, ch. 118, §§ 18, 19 and 21, related to the advertisement, manufacture, sale or display of cures for venereal diseases.

§ 35-4-138.
Introduction of solution in eyes of newborn child by attending physician.

It shall be the duty of every practicing or licensed physician in the state of Wyoming, when attending the birth of a child, to introduce or cause to be introduced into the eyes of the newborn infant a stable solution or ointment of a broad spectrum antibiotic as prescribed by the state department of health. Provided, that this section shall not apply in cases where the parents are religiously opposed to the use of drugs and so inform the attending physician.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 160, § 14; R.S. 1931, § 103-225; C.S. 1945, § 63-130; Laws 1957, ch. 20, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-183; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

For religious exception to required medical treatment, see §

35-1-201

.

As to serological test of pregnant women, see §§

35-4-501

to

35-4-505

.

§ 35-4-139.
Childhood immunizations.

The department of health through rule and regulation shall develop and implement a program to provide vaccines for all children of Wyoming residents who are not federally vaccine eligible children as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1396s(b)(2) or subsequent similar federal enactment. Vaccines provided pursuant to this section shall include those determined to be necessary for the healthy development of children and prescribed in rules and regulations of the department based on recommendations from an advisory group which the department director shall appoint consisting of a representative of an organization representing physicians licensed in Wyoming, at least one (1) pediatric physician licensed in Wyoming and at least one (1) family physician licensed in Wyoming.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 65, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 65, § 2 provides: “The department of health shall report to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee on the vaccination program required by this act on or before October 1, 2006 and again on or before October 1, 2007.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 65, § 3, provides:

“Five million dollars ($5,000,000.00) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of health for the biennium commencing July 1, 2006 to implement this act.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 65, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2006.